Utah statutes.
17B-1-115.   Validation of previously created local districts --
Continuation of certain local districts under this chapter -- Providing a
previously authorized service.
(1)  Each local district created before April 30, 2007 under the law in effect
at the time of the creation is declared to be validly and legally constituted.
(2)  An entity created and operating under the law in effect before April 30,
2007 as a local district but not as a cemetery maintenance district, drainage
district, fire protection district, improvement district, irrigation district,
metropolitan water district, mosquito abatement district, public transit
district, service area, or water conservancy district shall continue on and
after April 30, 2007 as a local district subject to the provisions of this
chapter but not subject to the provisions of Chapter 2a, Provisions Applicable
to Different Types of Local Districts.
(3)  Nothing in this title may be construed to prohibit or limit a local
district from providing on or after April 30, 2007 a service that it was
authorized before that date to provide.
